Nebraska, session 109, LB96.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB96 LB96
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 68-911, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
68-911 (1) Medical assistance shall include coverage for health care
and related services as required under Title XIX of the federal Social
Security Act, including, but not limited to:
(a) Inpatient and outpatient hospital services;
(b) Laboratory and X-ray services;
(c) Nursing facility services;
(d) Home health services;
(e) Nursing services;
(f) Clinic services;
(g) Physician services;
(h) Medical and surgical services of a dentist;
(i) Nurse practitioner services;
(j) Nurse midwife services;
(k) Pregnancy-related services;
(l) Medical supplies;
(m) Mental health and substance abuse services;
(n) Early and periodic screening and diagnosis and treatment
services for children which shall include both physical and behavioral
health screening, diagnosis, and treatment services;
(o) Rural health clinic services; and
(p) Federally qualified health center services.
(2) In addition to coverage otherwise required under this section,
medical assistance may include coverage for health care and related
services as permitted but not required under Title XIX of the federal
Social Security Act, including, but not limited to:
(a) Prescribed drugs;
(b) Intermediate care facilities for persons with developmental
disabilities;
(c) Home and community-based services for aged persons and persons
-2-

LB96 LB96
2025 2025
with disabilities;
(d) Dental services;
(e) Rehabilitation services;
(f) Personal care services;
(g) Durable medical equipment;
(h) Medical transportation services;
(i) Vision-related services;
(j) Speech therapy services;
(k) Physical therapy services;
(l) Chiropractic services;
(m) Occupational therapy services;
(n) Optometric services;
(o) Podiatric services;
(p) Hospice services;
(q) Mental health and substance abuse services;
(r) Hearing screening services for newborn and infant children; and
(s) Administrative expenses related to administrative activities,
including outreach services, provided by school districts and educational
service units to students who are eligible or potentially eligible for
medical assistance.
(3) No later than July 1, 2009, the department shall submit a state
plan amendment or waiver to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services to provide coverage under the medical assistance program for
community-based secure residential and subacute behavioral health
services for all eligible recipients, without regard to whether the
recipient has been ordered by a mental health board under the Nebraska
Mental Health Commitment Act to receive such services.
(4) On or before October 1, 2014, the department, after consultation
with the State Department of Education, shall submit a state plan
amendment to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, as
necessary, to provide that the following are direct reimbursable services
-3-

LB96 LB96
2025 2025
when provided by school districts as part of an individualized education
program or an individualized family service plan: Early and periodic
screening, diagnosis, and treatment services for children; medical
transportation services; mental health services; nursing services;
occupational therapy services; personal care services; physical therapy
services; rehabilitation services; speech therapy and other services for
individuals with speech, hearing, or language disorders; and vision-
related services.
(5)(a) No later than January 1, 2023, the department shall provide
coverage for continuous glucose monitors under the medical assistance
program for all eligible recipients who have a prescription for such
device.
(b) Effective August 1, 2024, eligible recipients shall include all
individuals who meet local coverage determinations, as defined in section
1869(f)(2)(B) of the federal Social Security Act, as amended, as such act
existed on January 1, 2024, and shall include individuals with
gestational diabetes.
(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that no more than six
hundred thousand dollars be appropriated annually from the Medicaid
Managed Care Excess Profit Fund, as described in section 68-996, for the
purpose of implementing subdivision (5)(b) of this section. Any amount in
excess of six hundred thousand dollars shall be funded by the Medicaid
Managed Care Excess Profit Fund.
(6) On or before October 1, 2023, the department shall seek federal
approval for federal matching funds from the federal Centers for Medicare
and Medicaid Services through a state plan amendment or waiver to extend
postpartum coverage for beneficiaries from sixty days to at least six
months. Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the department from
submitting a state plan amendment for twelve months.
(7)(a) No later than October 1, 2025, the department shall submit a
medicaid waiver or state plan amendment to the federal Centers for
-4-

LB96 LB96
2025 2025
Medicare and Medicaid Services to designate two medical respite
facilities to reimburse for services provided to an individual who is:
(i) Homeless; and
(ii) An adult in the expansion population.
(b) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) Adult in the expansion population means an adult (A) described
in 42 U.S.C. 1396a(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII) as such section existed on January
1, 2024, and (B) not otherwise eligible for medicaid as a mandatory
categorically needy individual;
(ii) Homeless has the same meaning as provided in 42 U.S.C. 11302 as
such section existed on January 1, 2024;
(iii) Medical respite care means short-term housing with supportive
medical services; and
(iv) Medical respite facility means a residential facility that
provides medical respite care to homeless individuals.
(c) The department shall choose two medical respite facilities, one
in a city of the metropolitan class and one in a city of the primary
class, best able to serve homeless individuals who are adults in the
expansion population.
(d) Once such waiver or state plan amendment is approved, the
department shall submit a report to the Health and Human Services
Committee of the Legislature on or before November 30 each year, which
provides the (i) number of homeless individuals served at each facility,
(ii) cost of the program, and (iii) amount of reduction in health care
costs due to the program's implementation.
(e) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
carry out this subsection.
(f) The services described in subdivision (7)(a) of this section
shall be funded by the Medicaid Managed Care Excess Profit Fund as
described in section 68-996.
(8)(a) No later than January 1, 2025, the department shall provide
-5-

LB96 LB96
2025 2025
coverage for an electric personal-use breast pump for every pregnant
woman covered under the medical assistance program, or child covered
under the medical assistance program if the pregnant woman is not
covered, beginning at thirty-six weeks gestation or the child's date of
birth, whichever is earlier. The electric personal-use breast pump shall
be capable of (i) sufficiently supporting milk supply, (ii) double and
single side pumping, and (iii) suction power ranging from zero mmHg to
two hundred fifty mmHg. No later than January 1, 2025, the department
shall provide coverage for a minimum of ten lactation consultation visits
for every mother covered under the medical assistance program or child
covered under the medical assistance program, if the mother is not
covered under such program.
(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the appropriation for
lactation consultation visits shall be equal to an amount that is a one
hundred forty-five percent rate increase over the current lactation
consultation rate paid by the department.
(9)(a) No later than January 1, 2024, the department shall provide
coverage, and reimbursement to providers, for all necessary translation
and interpretation services for eligible recipients utilizing a medical
assistance program service. The department shall take all actions
necessary to maximize federal funding to carry out this subsection.
(b) The services described in subdivision (9)(a) of this section
shall be funded by the Medicaid Managed Care Excess Profit Fund as
described in section 68-996.
(10)(a) No later than July 1, 2025, the department shall submit a
section 1115 waiver for a reentry demonstration opportunity to the
federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. The reentry
demonstration opportunity waiver shall be designed to assist in
successful reentry to society and reduce future justice system
involvement for incarcerated populations. Providing individuals leaving
correctional facilities the opportunity to receive short-term medicaid
-6-

LB96 LB96
2025 2025
enrollment assistance and prerelease coverage for certain services will
facilitate successful transitions.
(b) The section 1115 waiver application shall include, but not be
limited to, coverage for:
(i) Case management services to assess and address physical and
behavioral health needs and health-related social needs;
(ii) Medication-assisted treatment services for all types of
substance use disorders as clinically appropriate, including coverage for
medications in combination with counseling and behavioral therapies;
(iii) A thirty-day supply of all prescription medications and over-
the-counter drugs, or equivalent, such as long-acting injectibles, as
clinically appropriate, provided immediately upon an individual's release
from a correctional facility, consistent with approved medicaid state
plan coverage and policy;
(iv) Medication administration;
(v) Services provided by community health workers;
(vi) Diagnostic and treatment services, including laboratory and
radiology services;
(vii) Medical equipment and supplies provided upon release; and
(viii) Housing supports, including utility assistance, pre-tenancy
and tenancy sustaining services, and medically necessary home
modifications.
(11)(a) No later than July 1, 2025, the department shall submit an
1115 demonstration waiver for health-related social needs to the federal
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. The health-related social
needs demonstration waiver shall help formerly incarcerated individuals
secure basic needs for a limited time postrelease and assist localities
with care-related improvements. Providing localities and individuals with
federal funding will facilitate successful transitions, reduce
recidivism, and ease the existing financial burden on state and local
taxpayers.
-7-

LB96 LB96
2025 2025
(b) The section 1115 demonstration waiver for health-related social
needs application shall include, but not be limited to, funding coverage
for:
(i) Rent or temporary housing support for up to six months for
individuals experiencing homelessness as a result of transitioning out of
correctional facilities;
(ii) Food assistance or nutritional support for up to six months;
(iii) Correctional facility or social service infrastructure
investments in technology, operational practices, workforce development,
and marketing outreach and education;
(iv) Case management to connect formerly incarcerated individuals
with reentry groups and services; and
(v) A subsidy, not to exceed one hundred dollars per individual, for
the purchase of an Internet-connected device such as a mobile phone or
laptop computer.
Sec. 2. Original section 68-911, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-8-